Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin INDIVIDUAL PROVIDER WAGE REMEDIATION REQUIRED.new text end new text begin For provisions of the most recent collective bargaining agreement between SEIU Healthcare Minnesota and Iowa and the state of Minnesota that were not implemented on January 1, 2026, due to the lack of federal approval of the associated state plan amendments, if the federal approval includes a retroactive rate increase, the provisions of the most recent collective bargaining agreement are effective retroactively from the same date as the retroactive rate increase. The commissioner of human services must issue instructions to ensure that wage remediation occurs for all individual providers covered by the collective bargaining agreement as soon as possible following federal approval and all individual providers covered by the collective bargaining agreement receive back pay for the period between federal approval and the effective date of the retroactive rate increase. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end